Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3020
Conditions to commence business; compliance required; failure to commence business; effect.

(1) If an application is approved, a charter shall not be issued and the digital asset depository shall not commence business before satisfaction of all conditions precedent contained in the director's order or conditional order.

(2) If an approved digital asset depository fails to commence business in good faith within twelve months after the issuance of a charter, the charter shall expire. The director, for good cause and upon an application filed prior to the expiration of the twelve-month period, may extend the time within which the digital asset depository may open for business.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 20;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 34.